test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj_Ulik_S_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja (Maja: Javel?) 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:

  Adjective - båeries: # c 
    båeries+A+Attr: båeries 
    båeries+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [båarasåbpoe, båarasabpa]
    båeries+A+Sg+Nom: båeries 
    båeries+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [båarasommes, båarasammes]
    
  Adjective - dearkoes: # 
    dearkoes+A+Attr: [dearkoes, dearkas] 
    dearkoes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [dearkoesåbpoe, dearkasabpa, dearkasåbpoe] # check vocals in the center in relation to -åbpoe,-abpa,-ommes,-ammes

    dearkoes+A+Sg+Nom: [dearkoes, dearkas] 
    dearkoes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [dearkoesommes, dearkasammes, dearkasommes] # check vocals in the center in relation to -åbpoe,-abpa,-ommes,-ammes

  
   
  Adjective - dasmoes: # 
    dasmoes+A+Attr: dasmoes 
    dasmoes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: dasmoesåbpoe
    dasmoes+A+Sg+Nom: dasmoes 
    dasmoes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: dasmoesommes
    
    
  Adjective - dåsmoes: # 
    dåsmoes+A+Attr: dåsmoes 
    dåsmoes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: dåsmoesåbpoe
    dåsmoes+A+Sg+Nom: dåsmoes 
    dåsmoes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: dåsmoesommes
    
    
  Adjective - gieries: # 
    gieries+A+Attr: gieries 
    gieries+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [gearahkåbpoe, gearahkabpa, gearahgåbpoe,gearahgabpa, gearahtjabpa, gearahtjåbpoe]
    gieries+A+Sg+Nom: gearehke 
    gieries+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [gearahkommes, gearahgammes, gearahtjommes, gearahkammes, gearahtjammes, gearahgommes]
       
  Adjective - gööles: # 
    gööles+A+Attr: gööles 
    gööles+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [göölesåbpoe, göölesabpa]
    gööles+A+Sg+Nom: gööles 
    gööles+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [göölesommes, göölesammes] 
    
  Adjective - jearsoes: # 
    jearsoes+A+Attr: jearsoes 
    jearsoes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: jearsoesåbpoe
    jearsoes+A+Sg+Nom: jearsoes 
    jearsoes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: jearsoesommes
    
    
  Adjective - seadtoes: # c 
    seadtoes+A+Attr: [seadtoes, seadtas] 
    seadtoes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [seadtoesåbpoe, seadtasabpa, seadtasåbpoe] # check vocals in the center in relation to -åbpoe,-abpa,-ommes,-ammes
    seadtoes+A+Sg+Nom: [seadtoes, seadtas] 
    seadtoes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [seadtoesommes, seadtasammes, seadtasommes]
    
  Adjective - seakoes: # 
    seakoes+A+Attr: seakoes 
    seakoes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: seakoesåbpoe
    seakoes+A+Sg+Nom: seakoes 
    seakoes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: seakoesommes    
    
  Adjective - tjïrkes: # 
    tjïrkes+A+Attr: tjïrkes 
    tjïrkes+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [tjïrkesåbpoe, tjïrkesabpa]
    tjïrkes+A+Sg+Nom: tjïrkes 
    tjïrkes+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [tjïrkesommes, tjïrkesammes]
       
  Adjective - varres: # 
    varres+A+Attr: varres 
    varres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [varresåbpoe, varresabpa]
    varres+A+Sg+Nom: varres 
    varres+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [varresommes, varresammes] 
       
  Adjective - voeres: # 
    voeres+A+Attr: voeres 
    voeres+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [voeresåbpoe, voeresabpa]
    voeres+A+Sg+Nom: voeres 
    voeres+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [voeresommes, voeresammes]
  
  
    
